lexc-files/inflections/verb/verb-infl_semiFinalE.txt
!===================================
LEXICON VerbInflVII
!  for verbs that have semi-final -e
!===================================

!~~~~~~~~~~~~
! indicative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Ind.Intr]:^tu              IntrInd;
^[Ind.Trns]:^%{.sf.%}%{G%}a  TrnsInd;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! participial
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Ptcp.Intr]:^%{.m.%}lghii       IntrPtcp;
^[Ptcp.Trns]:^%{.sf.%}ke         TrnsPtcp;
!^[Ptcp.Intr]:^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ka  IntrPtcpAlternate; ! second participial mood?
!^[Ptcp.Trns]:^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ka  TrnsPtcpAlternate; ! ^[Jacobson (2001) p.73]

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! interrogative 
!   exhibits some fusional properties
!   so the full paradigms are given here
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
!---------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Intr]^[3Sg]:^ta^%{NULL%}  Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr]^[1Sg]:^tzi^nga           Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr.2Sg]:^tzin           Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Intr]^[3Pl]:^ta^t Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr]^[1Pl]:^%{.sf.%}este^a    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr.2Pl]:^%{.sf.%}etsi   Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Intr]^[3Du]:^ta^k Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr]^[1Du]:^%{.sf.%}este^ung  Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr.2Du]:^%{.sf.%}estek  Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|

!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.3Sg]:^ta^gu              Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.3Pl]:^ta^ki              Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.3Du]:^ta^kek              Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.3Sg]:^ta^tgu             Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.3Pl]:^ta^tki             Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.3Du]:^ta^tkek             Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.3Sg]:^ta^gnegu           Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.3Pl]:^ta^gneki           Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.3Du]:^ta^gnekek           Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Sg.3Sg]:^tzi^kun            Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Sg.3Pl]:^tzi^ngi            Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Sg.3Du]:^tzi^gngek           Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Pl.3Sg]:^%{.sf.%}este^ggu   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Pl.3Pl]:^%{.sf.%}este^ki    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Pl.3Du]:^%{.sf.%}este^kek    Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Du.3Sg]:^%{.sf.%}este^gnegu Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Du.3Pl]:^%{.sf.%}este^gneki Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Du.3Du]:^%{.sf.%}este^gnekek Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.3Sg]:^tzi^gu             Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.3Pl]:^tzi^ki             Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.3Du]:^tzi^kek             Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.3Sg]:^%{.sf.%}e^ggu      Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.3Pl]:^%{.sf.%}e^ki       Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.3Du]:^%{.sf.%}e^kek       Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.3Sg]:^%{.sf.%}e^gnegu    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.3Pl]:^%{.sf.%}e^gneki    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.3Du]:^%{.sf.%}e^gnekek    Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.1Sg]:^ta^nga             Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.1Pl]:^ti^nkut            Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.1Du]:^ti^nkung            Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.1Sg]:^ta^tnga            Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.1Pl]:^ti^nkut            Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.1Du]:^ti^nkung            Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.1Sg]:^ta^gnenga          Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.1Pl]:^ti^nkut            Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.1Du]:^ti^nkung            Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
! no ^[1--.1--] forms                                                                                                                                            | 
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.1Sg]:^tzi^nga            Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.1Pl]:^tzi^kut            Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.1Du]:^tzi^kung            Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.1Sg]:^%{.sf.%}e^ngnga    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.1Pl]:^%{.sf.%}e^kut      Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.1Du]:^%{.sf.%}e^kung      Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.1Sg]:^%{.sf.%}e^gnenga   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.1Pl]:^%{.sf.%}e^gneku    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.1Du]:^%{.sf.%}e^gnekung   Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.2Sg]:^ta^ten             Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.2Pl]:^ti^si              Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.2Du]:^ti^stek             Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.2Sg]:^ta^ten             Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.2Pl]:^ti^si              Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.2Du]:^ti^stek             Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.2Sg]:^ta^ten             Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.2Pl]:^ti^si              Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.2Du]:^ti^stek             Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Sg.2Sg]:^tzi^ken            Enclitic;                                                     |                                                      |
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Pl.2Sg]:^%{.sf.%}este^ken   Enclitic;                                                     |                                                      |
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Du.2Sg]:^%{.sf.%}este^ken   Enclitic;                                                     |                                                      |
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
! no ^[2--.2--] forms                                                                                                                                            |
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! present optative 
!   exhibits some fusional properties
!   so the full paradigms are given here
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
!------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[3Sg]:^li^%{NULL%}  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[1Sg]:^la^nga           Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr.2Sg]:^%{.sf.%}i Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[3Pl]:^li^t Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[1Pl]:^%{.sf.%}elte^a   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[2Pl]:^te^k    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[3Du]:^li^k Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[1Du]:^%{.sf.%}elte^ung Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[2Du]:^te^k    Enclitic;
!------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|

!------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.3Sg]:^li^gu              Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.3Pl]:^li^ki              Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.3Du]:^li^kek              Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.3Sg]:^li^tgu             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.3Pl]:^li^tki             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.3Du]:^li^tkek             Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.3Sg]:^li^gnegu           Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.3Pl]:^li^gneki           Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.3Du]:^li^gnekek           Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.3Sg]:^la^kun             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.3Pl]:^la^ngi             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.3Du]:^la^ngak             Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.3Sg]:^%{.sf.%}elte^ggu   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.3Pl]:^%{.sf.%}elte^ki    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.3Du]:^%{.sf.%}elte^kek    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.3Sg]:^%{.sf.%}elte^gnegu Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.3Pl]:^%{.sf.%}elte^gneki Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.3Du]:^%{.sf.%}elte^gnekek Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns.2Sg.3Sg]:^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ggu   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.3Pl]:^%{NULL%}^ki                Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.3Du]:^%{NULL%}^kek                Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.3Sg]:^te^ggu             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.3Pl]:^te^ki              Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.3Du]:^te^kek              Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.3Sg]:^te^gnegu           Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.3Pl]:^te^gneki           Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.3Du]:^te^gnekek           Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.1Sg]:^li^nga             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.1Pl]:^li^kut             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.1Du]:^li^kung             Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.1Sg]:^li^tnga            Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.1Pl]:^li^nkut            Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.1Du]:^li^nkung            Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.1Sg]:^li^gnenga          Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.1Pl]:^li^nkut            Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.1Du]:^li^nkung            Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
! no ^[1--.1--] forms                                                                                                                                                     |
!------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.1Sg]:^%{NULL%}^nga               Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.1Pl]:^%{NULL%}^kut               Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.1Du]:^%{NULL%}^kung               Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.1Sg]:^te^ngnga           Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.1Pl]:^te^kut             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.1Du]:^te^kung             Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.1Sg]:^te^gnenga          Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.1Pl]:^te^gnekut          Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.1Du]:^te^gnekung          Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.2Sg]:^la^ten             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.2Pl]:^li^si              Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.2Du]:^li^stek             Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.2Sg]:^la^ten             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.2Pl]:^li^si              Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.2Du]:^li^stek             Enclitic;
